North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-09 Parent and Child
14-09-09.10.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Arrears registry” means the registry maintained under section 50-09-02.7.

“Business day” means every day that is not a Saturday or legal holiday.

“Child support” means payments for the support of a child, including payments for health insurance coverage or other medical support, and payments for the support of spouses or former spouses with whom the child is living as long as the spousal support payment is owed to the spouse or former spouse under the same order as the payments for the child, if the payment is required by the order of a court or other governmental agency having authority to issue such orders, and includes past-due support.

“Child support agency” means the department of health and human services in execution of its duties pursuant to the state plan submitted under chapter 50-09 in conformance with title IV-D of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 93-647; 88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.].

“Delinquent” means a situation which occurs on the first working day after the day upon which a child support payment was identified as due and unpaid, and the total amount of unpaid child support is at least equal to the amount of child support payable in one month.

“Disposable income” means gross income less deductions required by law for taxes and social security.

“Employer” means income payer.

“Health insurance” includes fees for service, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, comprehensive health association plan, accident and health insurance policies, group health plans as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [Pub. L. 99-272; 100 Stat. 281; 29 U.S.C. 1167(1)], and other types of coverage under which major medical coverage may be provided in a policy, plan, or contract which may legally be sold or provided in this state.

“Income” means any form of payment, regardless of source, owed to an obligor, including any earned, unearned, taxable or nontaxable income, workforce safety and insurance benefits, disability benefits, unemployment compensation benefits, annuity and retirement benefits, but excluding public assistance benefits administered under state law.

“Income payer” means any person, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, political subdivision, or department or agency of the state or federal government owing income to an obligor and includes an obligor if the obligor is self-employed.

“Monthly support obligation” means an amount of child support ordered by a court or administrative tribunal in a proceeding to establish or modify a child support obligation, including amounts that are deferred for payment at a later date. The term is defined without regard to any amount of child support that an obligor is required to pay to avoid being held in contempt of court. If an amount of past-due support has been ordered as a lump sum rather than determined on a monthly basis, “monthly support obligation” means one hundred sixty-eight dollars.

“Obligee” means a person, including a state or political subdivision, to whom a duty of support is owed.

“Obligor” means any person owing a duty of support.

“Past-due support” means child support that is not paid by the earlier of:

The date a court order or an order of an administrative process established under state law requires payment to be made; or

The last day of the month or other period the payment was intended to cover.

“Payday” means the day upon which the income payer pays or otherwise credits the obligor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 2; 1987, ch. 181, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 9; 1989, ch. 148, § 5; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 461, § 3; 1997, ch. 404, § 25; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 415, § 5; 2007, ch. 417, § 2; 2007, ch. 149, § 6; 2009, ch. 419, § 3; 2013, ch. 12, § 8; 2021, ch. 352, § 37, effective September 1, 2022.

14-09-09.11.
Income withholding order.

When a judgment or order requires the payment of child support, it may be enforced by an income withholding order, as provided in this chapter, in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 2; 1989, ch. 148, § 6.

14-09-09.12.
Provision of notice of impact of income withholding law to obligors.

Each judgment or order issued by a court in this state which includes an order for support of minor children, but which does not require immediate income withholding, must include a statement that a delinquency in payment of the support due or the approved request of the obligee will result in an income withholding order being issued in accordance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 3; 1987, ch. 181, § 3; 1989, ch. 148, § 9; 1991, ch. 153, § 3.

14-09-09.13.
Procedure — Notice to obligor.

If immediate income withholding under section 14-09-09.24 has not been implemented and an obligor is delinquent, if an obligee’s request for income withholding is approved, or if a court changes its finding that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding, the child support agency shall serve the notice required under this section upon the obligor whenever issuing an income withholding order. The notice must state:

That the obligor is delinquent in the payment of child support, that a request for withholding has been made by the obligee and approved by the child support agency, or that there is no longer good cause not to require immediate income withholding, as the case may be, and the obligor is therefore subject to an income withholding order on all income.

The amount of child support owed and the amount of arrearage, if any.

The total amount of money that will be withheld by the income payer from the obligor’s income in each month as determined under section 14-09-09.30.

That the income payer may withhold an additional sum of three dollars to cover the income payer’s expenses.

That the income withholding order has been issued without further order of the court.

That the obligor may contest the issuance of the income withholding order by filing a written request for hearing within ten days of the date of the notice made under this section.

That if the obligor contests the income withholding order pursuant to section 14-09-09.14, a hearing will be held and the court will determine and issue an order consistent with the requirements of section 14-09-09.14.

That the income withholding order applies to any current or subsequent income payer or period of employment.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 4; 1989, ch. 148, § 10; 1991, ch. 152, § 4; 1993, ch. 152, § 13; 1997, ch. 404, § 26; 2003, ch. 125, § 3.

14-09-09.14.
Hearing upon obligor’s request.

If the obligor files a request for a hearing within ten days of the date of the notice made pursuant to section 14-09-09.13, the court shall hold a hearing within ten working days after the date of the request.

The court may order that the income withholding order be withdrawn if at the hearing the obligor establishes:

In a case where withholding would be based on an alleged delinquency, that there has been a mistake in the identity of the obligor; or

In a case where an approved request for withholding has been made by the obligee, that the approval of the request constituted an abuse of discretion.

If at the hearing the obligor establishes that there is an overstatement in the amount of support stated to be owed by the obligor, the court may amend the amount to be withheld.

In the absence of a finding of a mistake of fact in a case in which withholding would be based on an alleged delinquency, or in the absence of an abuse of discretion in the approval of an obligee’s request for withholding, the court shall confirm the income withholding order. Payment of past-due support after issuance of notice under section 14-09-09.13 may not be the basis for an order that the income withholding order be withdrawn.

An obligor is not precluded by subsection 1 from seeking appropriate relief from a judgment or order affecting a child support obligation nor is the court precluded from granting such relief. An obligor’s request for such relief, whether made by motion under rule 60(b) of the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure or otherwise, may not be considered during the hearing described in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 5; 1987, ch. 181, § 4; 1989, ch. 148, § 11; 1997, ch. 404, § 27.

14-09-09.15.
Form — Effect of income withholding order.

The income withholding order must be issued in the name of the state of North Dakota in the standard format for notice of the order prescribed by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services under authority of 42 U.S.C. 666(b)(6)(A)(ii), contain only the information necessary for the income payer to comply with the income withholding order, and be directed to all current and subsequent income payers of the obligor. The income withholding order is binding on the income payer until further notice by the child support agency and applies to all current and subsequent periods in which income is owed the obligor by the income payer. The income withholding order has priority over any other legal process against the same income.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 6; 1997, ch. 404, § 28; 1999, ch. 141, § 7; 2003, ch. 125, § 4.

14-09-09.16.
Service of income withholding order on income payer.

The child support agency shall serve the income withholding order on the income payer by first-class mail or in any other manner agreed to by the income payer, and upon the obligor by first-class mail to the obligor’s last-known address.

If the obligor is subject to immediate income withholding under section 14-09-09.24, an income withholding order must be served on any known income payer within two business days of the date of receipt of information necessary to carry out income withholding. Subject to the provisions of section 14-09-09.17, if service of an income withholding order has been or may have been properly made under this section, an income withholding order must be served on any subsequently identified income payer within two business days of the date of receipt of information necessary to carry out income withholding.

An income withholding order may also be issued and served at the request of the obligor.

The income payer shall withhold a stated amount, determined under section 14-09-09.30, from the obligor’s income at the time the obligor is paid for transmittal to the child support agency within seven business days of the date the obligor is paid, together with a report of the date upon which the amount was withheld from the obligor’s income.

The income payer may also withhold and retain an additional sum of three dollars per month from the obligor’s income to cover expenses involved in transmitting payment.

The amount to be withheld, including amounts to cover expenses involved in transmitting payment, may not exceed fifty percent of the obligor’s disposable income from this income payer, but a payment of an amount less than the ordered amount must be accompanied by a written calculation disclosing any of the obligor’s income and disposable income which is payable by the income payer.

The income payer shall begin withholding no later than the first payday that occurs after service of the income withholding order.

If the income payer is served with more than one income withholding order issued under this chapter on a single obligor and the combined total amount to be paid under the income withholding orders exceeds fifty percent of the obligor’s disposable income, the income payer shall withhold the maximum amount permitted and transmit to the child support agency that portion thereof which the obligee’s claim bears to the combined total of all claims.

The income payer shall notify the child support agency in writing of the termination of a duty to pay income to the obligor within seven business days of the termination. The notification must include the name and address of the obligor’s subsequent income payer, if known.

If the income payer is subject to income withholding orders for more than one obligor, the income payer may combine in a single payment the amounts for all obligors who have been ordered to pay the child support agency with identification of the amount attributed to each obligor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 7; 1987, ch. 181, § 5; 1989, ch. 148, § 12; 1991, ch. 152, § 5; 1993, ch. 152, § 14; 1995, ch. 155, § 2; 1995, ch. 157, § 1; 1997, ch. 404, § 29; 1999, ch. 141, § 8; 1999, ch. 142, § 2; 2003, ch. 125, § 5.

14-09-09.17.
Amendment — Termination of income withholding order.

Upon amendment or termination of an income withholding order, the child support agency shall send appropriate notice to the income payer. An income withholding order is to be amended by the child support agency when the total amount of money to be withheld is changed by elimination of arrearages or by court-ordered change in amount of child support. An income withholding order is to be terminated when the duty to support ceases and all child support arrearages have been paid. When two or more income payers have been subjected to income withholding orders with respect to a child support obligation, the child support agency shall suspend the income withholding order directed to one or more income payers, provided that the amount of child support withheld by the remaining income payer or payers equals the amount determined under section 14-09-09.30. The child support agency shall immediately reinstate any suspended income withholding order should any child support obligation of the obligor thereafter become delinquent. The child support agency shall provide a copy of the reinstated income withholding order, by first-class mail, to the obligor and the income payer.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 8; 1989, ch. 148, § 13; 1993, ch. 152, § 15; 1997, ch. 404, § 30; 2003, ch. 125, § 6.

Note.

Section 17 of chapter 152, S.L. 1991 provided that the amendment by section 6 of chapter 152, S.L. 1991 was contingent upon the adoption of certain regulations prior to August 15, 1990.

For attorney general’s opinion finding that the amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 152, S.L. 1991, did not become effective July 10, 1992, and may not become effective at any other time, see attorney general’s opinion 92-17.

14-09-09.18.
Interstate income withholding — Initiation by this state to other state.

On application of a resident of this state, an obligee or an obligor of a support order issued by this state, or an agency to which an obligee has assigned support rights, the child support agency shall request the child support enforcement agency of another state in which the obligor of a support order derives income to enter the order for the purpose of obtaining income withholding against such income. The child support agency shall make that request within twenty days of the later of the date income withholding is determined appropriate or the date of receipt of any information necessary to carry out withholding. The child support agency shall compile and transmit to the child support agency of the other state all documentation required to enter an order for this purpose. The child support agency shall also transmit to the child support agency of the other state certified copies of any subsequent modifications of the support order. If the child support agency receives notice that the obligor is contesting the income withholding in another state, it shall immediately notify the individual obligee of the date, time, and place of the hearings and of the obligee’s right to attend.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 9; 1997, ch. 150, § 1.

14-09-09.19.
Interstate income withholding — Duties of the public authority upon receipt of request from another state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 4.

14-09-09.20.
Interstate income withholding — Notice to obligor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 4.

14-09-09.21.
Interstate income withholding — Hearing upon request of obligor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 4.

14-09-09.22.
Interstate income withholding — Form — Service on income payor — Termination of order. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 157, § 4.

14-09-09.23.
Administration of income withholding. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 77.

14-09-09.24.
Immediate income withholding.

Except as provided in subsection 2 or 3, each judgment or order which requires the payment of child support, issued or modified on or after January 1, 1990, subjects the income of the obligor to income withholding, regardless of whether the obligor’s support payments are delinquent.

If a party to a proceeding, who would otherwise be subject to immediate income withholding under subsection 1, demonstrates, and the court finds that there is good cause not to require immediate withholding, or if the parties, including any assignee of support rights, reach a written agreement that provides for an alternative arrangement for assuring the regular payment of child support, the court need not subject the income of the obligor to immediate withholding.

If an obligor, who would otherwise be subject to immediate income withholding under subsection 1 in at least one case in which services are being provided by a child support agency under title IV-D, demonstrates, and a child support agency finds there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding, the child support agency may enter into a written agreement with an obligor that provides for an alternate payment arrangement in lieu of immediate income withholding. Notwithstanding section 14-09-09.13, any failure to comply with an agreement under this subsection subjects the income of the obligor to income withholding under this section. Any obligee aggrieved by a finding of a child support agency under this subsection may seek review of the finding under subsection 2 of section 50-09-14.

A finding that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding under subsection 2 or 3 must be based on at least:

A written determination that, and an explanation of why, implementing immediate income withholding would not be in the best interests of the child;

Proof of timely payment of previously ordered support, if any; and

A requirement that the obligor keep the child support agency informed of any employment-related health insurance to which the obligor has access.

A written agreement for an alternative arrangement for assuring the regular payment of child support is effective only if the agreement at least, in addition to other conditions the parties agree to:

Provides that the obligor shall keep the child support agency informed of any employment-related health insurance to which the obligor has access;

Describes the provisions by which regular payment of child support is assured; and

Is reviewed and approved by the court and entered into the court’s records.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 7; 1991, ch. 152, § 7; 1997, ch. 404, § 31; 2005, ch. 134, § 1; 2009, ch. 419, § 4.

14-09-09.25.
Requests by obligee for income withholding — Approval — Procedures and standards.

An obligee may apply to the child support agency for approval of an income withholding request. The income of the obligor becomes subject to income withholding on the date an approved request is made.

The child support agency shall establish procedures and standards for the approval of obligee requests for income withholding. The standards established must include consideration of:

An obligor’s threat to discontinue child support payments; and

An obligor’s having made child support payments sufficient to avoid a delinquency but insufficient to conform to the ordered amount.

Upon application of an obligee requesting income withholding, the child support agency shall promptly approve or disapprove the request. The child support agency may not approve the obligee’s request in a case where the court has determined that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding unless the court first changes its determination.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 8; 1991, ch. 152, § 8; 1997, ch. 404, § 32.

14-09-09.26.
State is real party in interest.

The state is a real party in interest for purposes of establishing paternity and securing repayment of benefits paid, future support, and costs in action brought to establish, modify, or enforce an order for support of a child in any of the following circumstances:

Whenever aid under chapter 50-09 or 50-24.1 is provided to a dependent child.

Whenever application is made and accepted for services provided by the child support agency.

Whenever duties are imposed on the state or its public officials under chapter 14-12.2.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 152, § 9; 1995, ch. 157, § 2; 2013, ch. 124, § 2.

14-09-09.27.
Attorney represents people’s interest in the enforcement of child support obligations.

In any action brought to establish paternity, secure repayment of governmental benefits paid, secure current or future support of children, or establish, enforce, or modify a child support obligation, the child support agency may employ or contract with a licensed attorney. An attorney so employed or contracted represents the interest of the people of the state of North Dakota in the enforcement of child support obligations. Nothing in this section may be construed to modify confidentiality required of the child support agency. Representation by the employed or contracted attorney may not be construed to create an attorney-client relationship between the attorney and any party or witness to the action, other than the people of the state of North Dakota, regardless of the name in which the action is brought.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 152, § 10.

14-09-09.28.
Application to existing cases.

Sections 14-09-09.26, 14-09-09.27, 14-12.2-19, and 14-12.2-20 apply to actions filed prior to July 7, 1991.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 152, § 11; 1999, ch. 141, § 9.

14-09-09.29.
Coordination of income withholding activities and child support case management.

The child support agency is responsible for administration of income withholding, managing accrual and termination dates and payment ledger adjustments on the automated system established under section 50-09-02.1, and the receipt and disbursement of child support payments. This section also applies to an order that does not require the payment of child support but requires the payment of spousal support, if the court orders the spousal support be paid through the state disbursement unit or be enforced through income withholding.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 21; 1999, ch. 142, § 3; 2021, ch. 30, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

14-09-09.30.
Monthly amount due.

If there is a current monthly support obligation, the total amount of child support due in each month for purposes of income withholding is the sum of the obligor’s current monthly support obligation; and

The amount the obligor is ordered to pay toward any outstanding arrearage; or

If no order to repay an arrearage exists, an amount for application to any arrearage equal to twenty percent of the obligor’s current monthly support obligation; or

If there is no current monthly support obligation, the total amount of child support due in each month for purposes of income withholding is:

Unless either subdivision b or c applies, an amount equal to the greater of:

The amount the obligor is ordered to pay toward any outstanding arrearage; or

The sum of the obligor’s most recent monthly support obligation and twenty percent of the obligor’s most recent monthly support obligation;

An amount the obligor is ordered to pay toward an arrearage or, if no order to repay an arrearage exists, an amount equal to twenty percent of the obligor’s most recent monthly support obligation, if the supported child resides with the obligor pursuant to a court order; or

An amount the obligor is ordered to pay toward an arrearage if that amount is included in an order issued when there is no current monthly support obligation.

The total amount of child support due in each month under this section for purposes of income withholding may be increased at the request of the obligor to repay an arrearage or by agreement with the child support agency.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 24; 2003, ch. 125, § 7; 2005, ch. 122, § 2; 2015, ch. 126, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-09.31.
Child support exempt from process. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A child support obligation owed to an obligee who is a judgment debtor may not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, or other process except to satisfy that child support obligation. This section does not prohibit the child support agency from authorizing the state disbursement unit to apply a payment of past-due support owed to an obligee to a child support obligation owed by the same obligee or to another debt being enforced by the North Dakota department of human services that arises out of a public assistance program.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 152, § 2; 2007, ch. 148, § 8.

14-09-09.31.
Child support exempt from process. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A child support obligation owed to an obligee who is a judgment debtor may not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, or other process except to satisfy that child support obligation. This section does not prohibit the child support agency from authorizing the state disbursement unit to apply a payment of past-due support owed to an obligee to a child support obligation owed by the same obligee or to another debt being enforced by the North Dakota department of health and human services that arises out of a public assistance program.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 152, § 2; 2007, ch. 148, § 8; 2021, ch. 352, § 38, effective September 1, 2022.

14-09-09.32.
Agreements to waive child support.

An agreement purporting to relieve an obligor of any current or future duty of child support is void and may not be enforced. An agreement purporting to waive past-due child support is void and may not be enforced unless the child support obligee and any assignee of the obligee have consented to the agreement in writing and the agreement has been approved by a court of competent jurisdiction. A copy of the order of approval must be provided to the state disbursement unit. As used in this section, “child support” does not include spousal support.

In a judgment for divorce or other relief under this title in any matter in which the child and both of the child’s parents do not reside together, a court shall establish a child support obligation unless the child support agency requests the issue of child support be reserved. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the court may issue a stay of any further accruals under a child support order if the court finds the stay would be in the best interests of the child. Avoidance of income withholding or the requirement to make any child support payment through the state disbursement unit is not a proper basis to stay a child support obligation under this subsection. A child support obligation that is stayed under this subsection may be reinstated on a prospective basis as provided under the terms of the stay or at any time by order of the court or upon affidavit of any party. The party filing the affidavit shall provide a copy of the affidavit to any other party to the action and to the state disbursement unit.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 125, § 8; 2019, ch. 127, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

14-09-09.33.
Offsets of child support.

Notwithstanding section 14-09-09.31, a court may order that a specific amount of child support owed by an obligor to an obligee be offset by an equal amount of child support or other debts owed to the obligor by the obligee. An order for an offset is permitted under this subsection as long as the proposed offset does not apply to child support owed in the current month or owed in any future month, except as authorized in subsection 4, and the proposed offset does not include any child support that has been assigned.

The child support agency may offset child support if neither party objects after being notified of the proposed offset.

Child support owed by an obligor to an obligee may not be offset except as permitted in this section.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 14-09-09.24 or 14-09-09.30, an obligor’s child support obligation for the current month or for a future month may not be offset unless the court orders the offset as a method of satisfying an overpayment of child support that results from the establishment or reduction of a child support obligation, or as authorized by the child support agency under subsection 2, or as permitted in the child support guidelines established under section 14-09-09.7.

An offset of child support under this section is considered a payment of child support. A copy of the order for an offset must be provided to the state disbursement unit.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 125, § 9; 2007, ch. 148, § 9; 2009, ch. 419, § 5; 2013, ch. 124, § 3.

14-09-09.34.
Lump sum payments.

An income payer who has been served with an income withholding order issued under section 14-09-09.15 for an obligor which includes an amount for past-due support shall notify the child support agency before making any lump sum payment of one thousand dollars or more to the obligor and may report a lump sum payment of an amount less than one thousand dollars or of an amount yet to be determined. “Lump sum payment” includes pay in lieu of vacation or other leave, bonus, commission, and any other payment to an obligor but does not include periodic payments made on regular paydays as compensation for services, severance pay, or advances, and does not include reimbursement for expenses incurred by the obligor on behalf of the income payer.

An income payer who provides notice of a lump sum payment to the child support agency under subsection 1 may not make more than one-half of the payment to the obligor for thirty days from the date of the notice to the child support agency or until the income payer receives written authorization from the child support agency to make the lump sum payment to the obligor, whichever occurs first.

Notwithstanding subsection 2, an income payer who provides notice of a lump sum payment to the child support agency under subsection 1 may not make a lump sum payment to an obligor if the income payer has been notified that an execution, garnishment, attachment, or other process has been initiated regarding the lump sum payment to satisfy a child support obligation of the obligor.

An income payer who owes a lump sum payment under this section is subject to the duties and liabilities in section 14-09-09.3 unless the context indicates otherwise.

This section does not apply to any portion of a lump sum payment that must be paid to satisfy an income withholding order issued under section 14-09-09.15.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 125, § 10; 2013, ch. 124, § 4.

14-09-09.35.
Transfers of funds for payment of child support.

If a court determines that income withholding under this chapter is inapplicable, ineffective, or insufficient to ensure monthly payment of child support as determined under section 14-09-09.30, a court may, and upon request of a child support agency shall, order an obligor to identify or establish a deposit account that allows for periodic transfers of funds for payment of child support and to execute any necessary agreement for preauthorized transfers of funds from the account to the state disbursement unit for the payment of child support. An obligor who fails to comply with this section or make sufficient funds available to satisfy any preauthorized transfer, or who stops payment or revokes authorization for any preauthorized transfer, may be punished for contempt of court.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 134, § 2.

14-09-09.36.
Fee for child support services.

Any annual fee for child support services imposed by the child support agency under section 50-06.3-02 to conform with title IV-D of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 93-647; 88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.] shall be imposed on the obligee. The amount of the fee in a case which is being enforced under title IV-D must be less, on an annual basis, than the fee in a case which is not being enforced under title IV-D. Upon order of a court, the amount of the fee paid by the obligee may be collected from the obligor as past-due support.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 148, § 10.

14-09-09.37.
Allocation of tax exemption for the child. [Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 126, § 9, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2019, ch. 127, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

14-09-09.38
Child support obligation of incarcerated parents.

A monthly support obligation established under any provision of this code and in effect after December 31, 2017, expires by operation of law upon incarceration of the obligor under a sentence of one hundred eighty days or longer, excluding credit for time served before sentencing.

Notwithstanding subsection 1, a monthly support obligation may be established for an obligor incarcerated under a sentence of one hundred eighty days or longer if the obligation is based on actual income of the obligor and the moving party makes a prima facie showing the obligor’s income exceeds the minimum amount provided in the guidelines established under section 14-09-09.7.

As used in this section, “incarceration” means placement of an obligor in a custodial setting in which the obligor is not permitted to earn wages from employment outside the correctional facility, and does not include probation or work release.

The expiration of a monthly support obligation under subsection 1 does not affect any past-due support owed before the expiration of the obligation.

The child support agency shall notify the obligor and obligee of the expiration of a monthly support obligation under this section, including a description of how the obligation can be re-established after the obligor is released from incarceration.

If a monthly support obligation has expired under this section and the child support case is still open with the child support agency when the obligor is released from incarceration, the child support agency shall re-establish a monthly support obligation as provided in this chapter without requiring a request or application for services.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 119, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 115, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

14-09-09.39
Income withholding — Information provided to obligor.

If a new or amended child support order is issued by a court in a case enforced by a child support agency, the child support agency shall inform the obligor of the possibility the income withholding date may not align with the child support order date and of any affirmative steps the obligor may take to avoid a delinquent payment as a result of this possible misalignment.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 128, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

14-09-10.
Reciprocal duty of support for health services — Support of poor.

Each parent and every adult child of an adult who is unable to support oneself shall maintain that adult to the extent of the ability of each.

Except as provided under subsection 3, a creditor may not recover under this duty of support unless the:

Recovery sought by a creditor is for the furnishing of necessary health services, which may include medical and long-term care services;

Recovery sought is from a parent or adult child who received a direct benefit from a disqualifying transfer of an asset under section 50-06.2-07 or 50-24.1-02;

Recovery being sought from this parent or adult child does not exceed the fair market value, including any gain, resulting from the disqualifying transfer; and

Disqualifying transfer occurred within five years of the receipt of the necessary health services or application for medical assistance.

A creditor may recover under this duty to support if the:

Recovery is sought by a creditor for the furnishing of necessary health services, which may include medical and long-term care services;

Recovery is sought from a parent or adult child who acted in bad faith by misappropriating, misusing, or diverting income or assets of the other adult to prevent or avoid payment for necessary health services;

Recovery being sought from the parent or adult child does not exceed the fair market value, including any gain, resulting from the disqualifying transfer; and

Bad faith action occurred within five years of the receipt of the necessary health services.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 97; R.C. 1895, § 2787; R.C. 1899, § 2787; R.C. 1905, § 4099; C.L. 1913, § 4431; R.C. 1943, § 14-0910; S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 2; 2019, ch. 129, § 1, effective March 22, 2019.

14-09-11.
Allowance to parent for support of child.

The district court may direct an allowance to be made to a parent of a child out of its property for its past or future support and education on such conditions as may be proper, whenever such direction is for its benefit.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 92; R.C. 1895, § 2782; R.C. 1899, § 2782; R.C. 1905, § 4094; C.L. 1913, § 4426; R.C. 1943, § 14-0911.

14-09-12.
Support — Liability of parent’s estate. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

If a parent chargeable with the support of a child dies leaving it chargeable upon the human service zone and leaving an estate sufficient for its support, the department of human services, in the name of the human service zone, may claim provision for its support from the parent’s estate by civil action, and for this purpose may have the same remedies as any creditor against that estate and against the heirs, devisees, and next of kin of the parent.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 96; R.C. 1895, § 2786; R.C. 1899, § 2786; R.C. 1905, § 4098; C.L. 1913, § 4430; R.C. 1943, § 14-0912; 2019, ch. 391, § 7, effective January 1, 2020.

14-09-12.
Support — Liability of parent’s estate. [Effective September 1, 2022]

If a parent chargeable with the support of a child dies leaving it chargeable upon the human service zone and leaving an estate sufficient for its support, the department of health and human services, in the name of the human service zone, may claim provision for its support from the parent’s estate by civil action, and for this purpose may have the same remedies as any creditor against that estate and against the heirs, devisees, and next of kin of the parent.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 96; R.C. 1895, § 2786; R.C. 1899, § 2786; R.C. 1905, § 4098; C.L. 1913, § 4430; R.C. 1943, § 14-0912; 2019, ch. 391, § 7, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 39, effective September 1, 2022.

14-09-13.
Neglect of child — Parent liable to third person.

If a parent neglects to provide articles necessary for that parent’s child who is under that parent’s charge, according to that parent’s circumstances, a third person in good faith may supply such necessaries and recover the reasonable value thereof from the parent.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 98; R.C. 1895, § 2788; R.C. 1899, § 2788; R.C. 1905, § 4100; C.L. 1913, § 4432; R.C. 1943, § 14-0913.

14-09-14.
When parent not liable for support of child. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 141, § 25.

14-09-15.
Support of children after majority.

When a child, after attaining majority, continues to serve and to be supported by the parent, neither party is entitled to compensation in the absence of an agreement therefor.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 101; R.C. 1895, § 2791; R.C. 1899, § 2791; R.C. 1905, § 4103; C.L. 1913, § 4435; R.C. 1943, § 14-0915.